Florida, session 2026, SB1396.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 50 51 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âLitigation 52 Investment Safeguards and Transparency Act.â 53 Section 2.âSections 69.011, 69.021, 69.031, 69.041, 69.051, 54 69.061, 69.071, and 69.081, Florida Statutes, are designated as 55 part I of chapter 69, Florida Statutes, and entitled âGeneral 56 Provisions.â 57 Section 3.âPart II of chapter 69, Florida Statutes, 58 consisting of ss. 69.101, 69.103, 69.105, 69.107, and 69.109, 59 Florida Statutes, is created and entitled âLitigation 60 Financing,â to read: 61 62 PART II 63 LITIGATION FINANCING 64 69.101âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 65 (1)ââForeign personâ means a person or an entity that is 66 not: 67 (a)âA citizen of the United States; 68 (b)âAn alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in 69 the United States; 70 (c)âAn unincorporated association, a majority of members of 71 which are citizens of the United States or aliens lawfully 72 admitted for permanent residence in the United States; or 73 (d)âA corporation incorporated in the United States. 74 (2)ââForeign principalâ means: 75 (a)âThe government or a government official of any country 76 other than the United States; 77 (b)âA political subdivision or political party, or the 78 officials thereof, of a country other than the United States; or 79 (c)âAny partnership, association, corporation, 80 organization, or other combination of persons organized under 81 the laws of, or having its principal place of business in, a 82 country other than the United States whose shares or other 83 ownership interest is owned by the government or a government 84 official of a country other than the United States or owned by a 85 political subdivision or political party, or the officials 86 thereof, of a country other than the United States. 87 (3)ââForeign funderâ means a foreign person, foreign 88 principal, or sovereign wealth fund that provides funding 89 directly or indirectly under a litigation financing agreement. 90 (4)ââHealth care practitionerâ has the same meaning as in 91 s. 456.001. 92 (5)ââLitigation financierâ means a person engaged in the 93 business of providing litigation financing. 94 (6)ââLitigation financing agreementâ or âlitigation 95 financingâ means a transaction in which a litigation financier 96 agrees to provide financing to a person who is a party to, or an 97 attorney or law firm representing a party, in a civil action, an 98 administrative proceeding, a claim, or other legal proceeding in 99 exchange for a right to receive payment, which right is 100 contingent in any respect on the outcome of such action, claim, 101 or proceeding or on the outcome of any matter within a portfolio 102 that includes such action, claim, or proceeding and involves the 103 same counsel or affiliated counsel. However, the term does not 104 apply to any of the following: 105 (a)âAn agreement to provide funds for or to a party to a 106 civil action, an administrative proceeding, a claim, or other 107 legal proceeding for such personâs use in paying his or her 108 costs of living or other personal or familial expenses during 109 the pendency of such action, claim, or proceeding, which funds 110 are not used to finance any litigation or other legal costs. 111 (b)âAn agreement wherein an attorney consents to provide 112 legal services on a contingency fee basis or to advance his or 113 her clientâs legal costs, and where such services or costs are 114 provided by the attorney in accordance with the Florida Rules of 115 Professional Conduct or equivalent professional conduct rules 116 applicable in the attorneyâs licensing jurisdiction. 117 (c)âAn entity with a preexisting contractual obligation to 118 indemnify or defend a party to a civil action, an administrative 119 proceeding, a claim, or other legal proceeding. 120 (d)âA health insurer that has paid, or is obligated to pay, 121 any sums for health care for an injured person under the terms 122 of a health insurance plan or agreement. 123 (e)âThe repayment of a financial institution as defined in 124 s. 655.005 for loans made directly to a party to a civil action, 125 an administrative proceeding, a claim, or other legal 126 proceeding, or to such partyâs attorney, when repayment of the 127 loan is not contingent upon the outcome of such action, claim, 128 or proceeding or on the outcome of any matter within a portfolio 129 that includes such action, claim, or proceeding and involves the 130 same counsel or affiliated counsel. 131 (f)âFunding provided to a nonprofit organization exempt 132 from federal income tax under s. 501(c)(3) of the United States 133 Internal Revenue Code, provided that the nonprofit organization 134 uses the funding only to provide pro bono legal representation 135 on behalf of a client or to engage in litigation on behalf of 136 itself, its members, or a client and does not seek punitive 137 damages, regardless of whether the nonprofit organization seeks 138 an award of costs or attorney fees. 139 (g)âFunding provided by a nonprofit organization exempt 140 from federal income tax under s. 501(c)(3) of the United States 141 Internal Revenue Code, by grant or otherwise, to cover the costs 142 and expenses of pro bono legal representation or litigation that 143 does not seek punitive damages, regardless of whether the 144 recipient of the funding seeks an award of costs or attorney 145 fees. The nonprofit organization may, contingent upon the 146 outcome of the litigation, receive repayment not to exceed the 147 amount of funding provided. 148 (h)âFunding provided in a foreign class action lawsuit 149 where the party domiciled in the United States is a member of 150 the class. 151 (7)ââNational security interestsâ means those interests 152 relating to the national defense, foreign intelligence and 153 counterintelligence, international and domestic security, or 154 foreign relations. 155 (8)ââProprietary informationâ means information developed, 156 created, or discovered by a person, or which became known by or 157 was conveyed to a person, which has commercial value in the 158 personâs business. The term includes, but is not limited to, 159 domain names; trade secrets; copyrights; ideas; techniques; 160 inventions, regardless of whether patentable, and other 161 information of any type relating to designs; configurations; 162 documentation; recorded data; schematics; circuits; mask works; 163 layouts; source code; object code; master works; master 164 databases; algorithms; flow charts; formulae; works of 165 authorship; mechanisms; research; manufacture; improvements; 166 assembly; installation; intellectual property, including patents 167 and patent applications; and information concerning the personâs 168 actual or anticipated business, research, or development or 169 received in confidence by or for the person from any other 170 source. 171 (9)ââSovereign wealth fundâ means an investment fund owned 172 or controlled by a foreign principal or an agent thereof. 173 69.103âLitigation financing agreement; representation of 174 client interests; adequate representation.âA court may take the 175 existence of a litigation financing agreement into account: 176 (1)âIn a class action lawsuit brought in the courts of this 177 state, when determining whether a class representative or class 178 counsel would adequately and fairly represent the interests of 179 the class. 180 (2)âIn actions involving a common question of law or fact 181 pending before the court which may be or has been consolidated, 182 when determining whether the lead counsel or any co-lead counsel 183 would adequately and fairly represent the interests of the 184 parties to such actions. 185 69.105âProhibited conduct.âA litigation financier may not: 186 (1)âDirect, or make any decisions with respect to, the 187 course of any civil action, administrative proceeding, claim, or 188 other legal proceeding for which the litigation financier has 189 provided financing, or any settlement or other disposition 190 thereof. This prohibition includes, but is not limited to, 191 decisions in appointing or changing counsel, choice or use of 192 expert witnesses, and litigation strategy. All rights to make 193 decisions with respect to the course and settlement or other 194 disposition of the subject civil action, administrative 195 proceeding, claim, or other legal proceeding remain solely with 196 the parties to such action, claim, or proceeding and their 197 counsel of record. 198 (2)âContract for or receive, whether directly or 199 indirectly, a larger share of the proceeds of any civil action, 200 administrative proceeding, claim, or other legal proceeding 201 financed by a litigation financing agreement than the share of 202 the proceeds collectively recovered by the plaintiffs to any 203 such action, claim, or proceeding after the payment of any 204 attorney fees and costs owed in connection to such action, 205 claim, or proceeding. 206 (3)âPay or offer to pay a commission, referral fee, or 207 other consideration to any person, including an attorney, a law 208 firm, or a health care practitioner, for referring a person to 209 the litigation financier. 210 (4)âAssign or securitize a litigation financing agreement, 211 in whole or in part. 212 (5)âBe assigned rights to or in any civil action, 213 administrative proceeding, claim, or other legal proceeding for 214 which the litigation financier provided financing, other than 215 the right to receive a share of the proceeds of such action, 216 claim, or proceeding pursuant to the litigation financing 217 agreement. 218 69.107âTransparency for foreign litigation financiers.â 219 (1)âIf a party to any civil action, administrative 220 proceeding, claim, or other legal proceeding filed in the United 221 States, or that partyâs counsel of record, has entered into a 222 litigation financing agreement with a foreign person, foreign 223 principal, or sovereign wealth fund, the party, or the partyâs 224 counsel of record, must, within 14 days after execution of the 225 agreement or within 7 days after filing such action, whichever 226 occurs first, file and serve a notice with the court, agency, or 227 tribunal, and all other parties to the proceeding, which 228 identifies: 229 (a)âThe existence of the funding relationship; 230 (b)âThe foreign person, foreign principal, or sovereign 231 wealth fund by legal name and the jurisdiction under whose laws 232 it is organized; and 233 (c)âEach foreign person, foreign principal, or sovereign 234 wealth fund that, directly or indirectly, owns or controls 3 235 percent or more of the capital, equity, or other beneficial 236 ownership interests in the litigation financier, including the 237 legal name, address, and citizenship or country of incorporation 238 or registration of each such person or entity. 239 (2)âThe notice required in subsection (1) must be filed 240 with the court, agency, or tribunal in which the action is 241 pending, served on all parties, and provided to the Department 242 of Financial Services and the Office of the Attorney General. 243 (3)âThe dollar amounts, financing terms, and other 244 proprietary or trade secret information contained in or related 245 to the litigation financing agreement are not required to be 246 disclosed. The court, agency, or tribunal may order the notice 247 or supporting documentation to be filed under seal and may issue 248 protective orders as necessary to safeguard proprietary or 249 confidential information. 250 (4)âA foreign litigation financier or any person acting on 251 its behalf may not: 252 (a)âUse a domestic entity or an affiliate to conceal or 253 evade the disclosure requirements of this section; or 254 (b)âReceive, transmit, or share proprietary, privileged, or 255 national security-related information obtained through 256 litigation financing with any foreign person, foreign principal, 257 or sovereign wealth fund not a party or attorney to the action. 258 (5)âThe requirements of this section apply to a litigation 259 financing agreement entered into with any litigation financier 260 if a foreign person, foreign principal, or sovereign wealth fund 261 has provided or will provide funds, whether directly or 262 indirectly, to the litigation financier which amount to 5 263 percent or more of the funds the financier has provided or is 264 committed to provide under the litigation funding agreement. 265 (6)âFailure to comply with this section may subject the 266 noncomplying party to appropriate sanctions under s. 69.109 or 267 the applicable rules of civil procedure. This section does not 268 create a private cause of action. 269 69.109âViolations; enforcement.â 270 (1)âA litigation financing agreement executed in violation 271 of this part is void and unenforceable. 272 (2)âA violation of s. 69.105 is a deceptive and unfair 273 trade practice actionable under part II of chapter 501. 274 (3)âA court, an agency, or a tribunal of competent 275 jurisdiction may impose fines or any other sanction it deems 276 appropriate upon any person who violates s. 69.107. 277 Section 4.âIf any provision of this act or its application 278 to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity 279 does not affect other provisions or applications of the act 280 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or 281 application, and to this end the provisions of this act are 282 severable. 283 Section 5.âThe disclosure requirements in s. 69.107, 284 Florida Statutes, as created by this act, apply to any civil 285 action, administrative proceeding, claim, or other legal 286 proceeding pending or commenced on or after July 1, 2026. Any 287 party to or counsel of record for any civil action, 288 administrative proceeding, claim, or other legal proceeding 289 pending on July 1, 2026, who would have been required to make a 290 disclosure under s. 69.107, Florida Statutes, had it been in 291 effect at the time the relevant action occurred must make the 292 disclosure under that section by July 31, 2026. Failure to do so 293 is sanctionable as provided in s. 69.109, Florida Statutes. 294 Section 6.âExcept as otherwise provided in this act, this 295 act applies to a litigation financing agreement entered into on 296 or after July 1, 2026. 297 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.